Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-912
Ownership, acquisition, or control of subsidiary in foreign state; when.

Upon approval of the Federal Reserve Board and upon compliance with section 8-913, a bank holding company whose home state is Nebraska may own, acquire, or control a depository institution subsidiary in any foreign state.

Laws 1995, LB 384, § 23.